Florida, session 2026, HB723.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
45
46 Section 1. Paragraph (w) is added to subsection (5) of
47 section 212.08, Florida Statutes, to read:
48 212.08 Sales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and
49 storage tax; specified exemptions.—The sale at retail, the
50 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb723-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 723 2026
51 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following
52 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this
53 chapter.
54 (5) EXEMPTIONS; ACCOUNT OF USE.—
55 (w) Industrial machinery and equipment used by food
56 wholesalers in fiscally constrained counties.—
57 1. As used in this paragraph:
58 a. "Fiscally constrained county" means a county that is
59 entirely within a rural area of opportunity as designated by the
60 Governor pursuant to s. 288.0656 or a county for which the value
61 of a mill will raise no more than $5 million in revenue, based
62 on the taxable value certified pursuant to s. 1011.62(4)(a)1.a.,
63 from the previous July 1.
64 b. "Food establishment" has the same meaning as in s.
65 500.03.
66 c. "Industrial machinery and equipment" means tangible
67 personal property or other property that has a depreciable life
68 of at least 3 years and that is used as an integral part in the
69 manufacturing, processing, packing, holding, production, or sale
70 of wholesale food products. The term includes a building and its
71 structural components, including heating and air-conditioning
72 systems.
73 2. Industrial machinery and equipment purchased by a food
74 establishment that is manufacturing, processing, packing,
75 holding, producing, or selling food at wholesale at fixed
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb723-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 723 2026
76 locations within a fiscally constrained county is exempt from
77 the tax imposed by this chapter. If, at the time of purchase,
78 the purchaser furnishes the seller with a signed certificate
79 certifying the purchaser's entitlement to exemption permitted by
80 this paragraph, the seller is not required to collect the tax on
81 the sale of such item, and the department shall look solely to
82 the purchaser for recovery of the tax if it determines that the
83 purchaser was not entitled to the exemption.
84 Section 2. Paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of section
85 215.971, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
86 215.971 Agreements funded with federal or state
87 assistance.—
88 (1) An agency agreement that provides state financial
89 assistance to a recipient or subrecipient, as those terms are
90 defined in s. 215.97, or that provides federal financial
91 assistance to a subrecipient, as defined by applicable United
92 States Office of Management and Budget circulars, must include
93 all of the following:
94 (h) If the agency agreement provides federal or state
95 financial assistance to a county or municipality that is a rural
96 community or rural area of opportunity as those terms are
97 defined in s. 288.0656(2), a provision allowing the agency to
98 provide for the payment of invoices to the county, municipality,
99 or rural area of opportunity as that term is defined in s.
100 288.0656(2), for verified and eligible performance that has been
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb723-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 723 2026
101 completed in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth
102 in the agreement. Such provision is not intended to require
103 reimbursement to the county or municipality that is a rural
104 community or rural area of opportunity for invoices paid but is
105 intended to allow the agency to provide for the payment of
106 invoices due. The agency shall expedite such payment requests in
107 order to facilitate the timely payment of invoices received by
108 the county or municipality that is a rural community or rural
109 area of opportunity. This provision is included to alleviate the
110 financial hardships that certain rural counties and
111 municipalities encounter when administering agreements, and must
112 be exercised by the agency when a county or municipality
113 demonstrates financial hardship, to the extent that federal or
114 state law, rule, or other regulation allows such payments. This
115 paragraph may not be construed to alter or limit any other
116 provisions of federal or state law, rule, or other regulation.
117 Section 3. Subsection (3) of section 216.0153, Florida
118 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (4), and a new subsection
119 (3) is added to that section to read:
120 216.0153 Comprehensive state-owned real property system.—
121 Whereas, the Legislature finds that it is in the best interest
122 of the state to identify surplus property and dispose of such
123 property owned by the state that is unnecessary to achieving the
124 state's responsibilities, that may cost more to maintain than
125 the revenue generated, that does not serve any public purpose,
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb723-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 723 2026
126 or from which the state may derive a substantially similar
127 public purpose under private ownership.
128 (3)(a) The state may not purchase any land in a fiscally
129 constrained county as defined in s. 212.08(5)(w)1. if the
130 combination of federal- and state-owned lands is greater than 40
131 percent of the total land in the fiscally constrained county.
132 This paragraph does not apply if:
133 1. The state identifies a parcel of land in the fiscally
134 constrained county that can be surplused.
135 2. The state obtains approval for the purchase from the
136 fiscally constrained county.
137 (b) The fiscally constrained county may request that the
138 Department of Environmental Protection analyze whether the
139 county should approve the purchase. The Department of
140 Environmental Protection shall conduct an analysis and provide a
141 detailed written explanation to the fiscally constrained county
142 within 90 days.
143 Section 4. Subsection (3) of section 339.2816, Florida
144 Statutes, is amended to read:
145 339.2816 Small County Road Assistance Program.—
146 (3) Beginning in with fiscal year 2026-2027 1999-2000
147 until fiscal year 2009-2010, and beginning again with fiscal
148 year 2012-2013, up to $50 $25 million annually from the State
149 Transportation Trust Fund may be used for the purposes of
150 funding the Small County Road Assistance Program as described in
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb723-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 723 2026
151 this section.
152 Section 5. Subsection (9) is added to section 339.2818,
153 Florida Statutes, to read:
154 339.2818 Small County Outreach Program.—
155 (9) Beginning in fiscal year 2026-2027, and annually
156 thereafter, at least $50 million from the State Transportation
157 Trust Fund may be used to fund the Small County Outreach
158 Program.
159 Section 6. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
160 409.975, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
161 409.975 Managed care plan accountability.—In addition to
162 the requirements of s. 409.967, plans and providers
163 participating in the managed medical assistance program shall
164 comply with the requirements of this section.
165 (1) PROVIDER NETWORKS.—Managed care plans must develop and
166 maintain provider networks that meet the medical needs of their
167 enrollees in accordance with standards established pursuant to
168 s. 409.967(2)(c). Except as provided in this section, managed
169 care plans may limit the providers in their networks based on
170 credentials, quality indicators, and price.
171 (a) Plans must include all providers in the region that
172 are classified by the agency as essential Medicaid providers,
173 unless the agency approves, in writing, an alternative
174 arrangement for securing the types of services offered by the
175 essential providers. Providers are essential for serving
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb723-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 723 2026
176 Medicaid enrollees if they offer services that are not available
177 from any other provider within a reasonable access standard, or
178 if they provided a substantial share of the total units of a
179 particular service used by Medicaid patients within the region
180 during the last 3 years and the combined capacity of other
181 service providers in the region is insufficient to meet the
182 total needs of the Medicaid patients. The agency may not
183 classify physicians and other practitioners as essential
184 providers. The agency, at a minimum, shall determine which
185 providers in the following categories are essential Medicaid
186 providers:
187 1. Federally qualified health centers.
188 2. Statutory teaching hospitals as defined in s.
189 408.07(46).
190 3. Hospitals that are trauma centers as defined in s.
191 395.4001(15).
192 4. Hospitals located at least 25 miles from any other
193 hospital with similar services.
194 5. Hospitals located in rural areas.
195
196 Managed care plans that have not contracted with all essential
197 providers in the region as of the first date of recipient
198 enrollment, or with whom an essential provider has terminated
199 its contract, must negotiate in good faith with such essential
200 providers for 1 year or until an agreement is reached, whichever
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb723-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 723 2026
201 is first. Payments for services rendered by a nonparticipating
202 essential provider shall be made at the applicable Medicaid rate
203 as of the first day of the contract between the agency and the
204 plan. A rate schedule for all essential providers shall be
205 attached to the contract between the agency and the plan. After
206 1 year, managed care plans that are unable to contract with
207 essential providers shall notify the agency and propose an
208 alternative arrangement for securing the essential services for
209 Medicaid enrollees. The arrangement must rely on contracts with
210 other participating providers, regardless of whether those
211 providers are located within the same region as the
212 nonparticipating essential service provider. If the alternative
213 arrangement is approved by the agency, payments to
214 nonparticipating essential providers after the date of the
215 agency's approval shall equal 90 percent of the applicable
216 Medicaid rate. Except for payment for emergency services, if the
217 alternative arrangement is not approved by the agency, payment
218 to nonparticipating essential providers shall equal 110 percent
219 of the applicable Medicaid rate.
220 Section 7. Section 1011.79, Florida Statutes, is created
221 to read:
222 1011.79 Rural District Graduate Placement Incentive Pilot
223 Program.—
224 (1) The Rural District Graduate Placement Incentive Pilot
225 Program is created within the Department of Education for the
Page 9 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb723-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 723 2026
226 purpose of financially rewarding rural school districts and
227 charter schools for preparing high school graduates with in-
228 demand certifications required for employment.
229 (2) Subject to legislative appropriation, the Department
230 of Education shall provide a bonus to a school district or
231 charter school located in a fiscally constrained county as
232 defined in s. 212.08(5)(w)1. for increasing the percentage of
233 students who:
234 (a) Graduate from a high school or charter school within
235 the district.
236 (b) Earn an industry certification included on the CAPE
237 Industry Certification Funding List described in s. 1008.44
238 while enrolled in a high school or charter school within the
239 district.
240 (c) Are employed in the fiscally constrained county in a
241 field for which such industry certification is required within 6
242 months after graduation.
243 (d) Remain employed in such field for at least 3 months.
244 (3) The amount of the bonus shall be specified in the
245 General Appropriations Act. If the appropriated funds are
246 insufficient to fully fund the total number of eligible high
247 school graduates, such funds must be prorated based on each
248 eligible school's proportionate share of the total number of
249 eligible high school graduates.
250 (4) A graduate's employment shall be verified using data
Page 10 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb723-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 723 2026
251 contained in the Florida Education and Training Placement
252 Information Program described in s. 1008.39.
253 (5) Each local workforce development board, education and
254 industry consortium described in s. 445.07, and regional
255 educational consortia described in s. 1001.451 shall assist
256 rural school districts and charter schools with increasing the
257 employment of students who have earned an industry certification
258 included on the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List
259 described in s. 1008.44.
260 (6) A rural school district or charter school that earns a
261 bonus pursuant to this section must use such funds to benefit
262 the workforce education programs provided by the school district
263 or charter school. Such funds may be used to upgrade equipment
264 or expand or otherwise improve such programs.
265 (7) This section expires July 1, 2029, unless reenacted by
266 the Legislature.
267 (8) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to
268 implement and administer this section.
269 Section 8. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 11 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb723-00